Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.060

Consumer report—Procedures for compliance—Information for governmental agency—Record.

(1) A consumer reporting agency shall maintain reasonable procedures designed to avoid violations of RCW 19.182.040 and to limit the furnishing of consumer reports to the purposes listed under RCW 19.182.020. These procedures must require that prospective users of the information identify themselves, certify the purposes for which the information is sought, and certify that the information will be used for no other purpose. A consumer reporting agency shall make a reasonable effort to verify the identity of a new prospective user and the uses certified by the prospective user before furnishing the user a consumer report. No consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report to a person if the agency has reasonable grounds for believing that the consumer report will not be used for a purpose listed in RCW 19.182.020.

(2) Whenever a consumer reporting agency prepares a consumer report it shall follow reasonable procedures to assure maximum possible accuracy of the information concerning the individual about whom the report relates.

(3) Notwithstanding RCW 19.182.020, a consumer reporting agency may furnish identifying information about a consumer, limited to the consumer's name, address, former addresses, places of employment, or former places of employment, to a governmental agency.

(4) A consumer reporting agency shall maintain a detailed record of:

(a) The identity of any person to whom a consumer report or information from a consumer report is provided by the consumer reporting agency; and

(b) The certified purpose for which a consumer report on a consumer, or any other information relating to a consumer, is requested by any person.

For purposes of this subsection, "person" does not include an individual who requests the report unless the individual obtains the report or information for his or her own purposes.

[ 1993 c 476 s 8.]